Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-149
National Guard; arms; supplies; issuance.

Arms, accoutrements, ammunition, supplies and stores shall be issued to the proper officers of each organization upon requisition as prescribed by the laws or regulations of the United States.

Laws 1929, c. 189, § 18, p. 661;

C.S.1929, § 55-123;

R.S.1943, § 55-126;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 47, p. 1597.